Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 28 Hospital District Elections [Repealed]

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

29 C.J.S. Elections, § 127.

§§ 22-28-101 through 22-8-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 115, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This chapter, which derived from Laws 1980, ch. 19, § 1, related to hospital district elections.